Utah statutes.
4-21-3.   Beef promotion fee -- Deposit of revenue -- Fee set by referendum
-- Reduction for amounts paid under federal law.
(1) (a)  The department shall collect a fee established as required by
Subsection (2) on all fee brand inspected cattle upon change of ownership or
slaughter in an amount not more than $1 or less than 25 cents.
(b)  The fee is collected by the local brand inspector at the time of
inspection of cattle, or deducted and collected by the marketing agency or the
purchaser.
(c)  All revenue collected under this section shall be paid to the department
which shall deposit the revenue in an agency fund that is hereby created and
shall be known as the "Beef Promotion Fund."
(2)  Before a fee assessed under Subsection (1) becomes effective, the
department shall give notice of the proposed fee to all known beef and dairy
cattle producers in the state, invite all beef and dairy cattle producers to
register to vote in a referendum, conduct a hearing on the proposed fee
change, and conduct a referendum where at least 50% of the registered
producers cast a vote with a majority of those voting casting an affirmative
vote on the proposed fee level.
(3)  Any fee currently assessed by the department continues in effect until
modified by the department under Subsections (1) and (2).
(4)  The fee assessed under this section shall be reduced by the amount of any
assessment required to be paid pursuant to the Beef Promotion and Research Act
of 1985, 7 U.S.C.  Sec.  2901 et seq.
